Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.040

Procedure on taking possession.

Upon the director taking possession of any domestic association, the director shall proceed to liquidate the association unless, in the director's discretion, the director shall determine to call a meeting of the members to consider either a proportionate charge-off against the deposit accounts to permit the association thereafter to continue in business, or whether the association should proceed to voluntary liquidation under the management of its board of directors. In such event, if the director approves the decision of a majority in amount of the members present and voting, the director shall order such action to be taken.

During any period of voluntary liquidation, the director may take possession of the association and its assets and complete the liquidation whenever, in the director's discretion, this seems advisable.

[ 1994 c 92 s 457; 1982 c 3 s 67; 1945 c 235 s 105; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-224. Prior: 1935 c 171 s 4; 1933 c 183 ss 70, 72, 78; 1919 c 169 s 13; 1913 c 110 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.